Alabama, session 2026rs, HB525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
(a) The Covington County Commission may adopt
Page 1

(a) The Covington County Commission may adopt
HB525 INTRODUCED
ordinances to do all of the following:
(1) Protect and enhance the public health and welfare
in the unincorporated area.
(2) Regulate the environmental impact of any industry,
project, activity, or similar endeavor proposed to be
undertaken in the county.
(3) Establish and provide for civil penalties for
violation of county ordinances.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the Covington
County Commission may not establish or levy any new tax or
raise revenue unless authorized by this constitution or by
general or local law.
(c) Unless otherwise provided by general or local law
in effect upon ratification of this amendment, the Covington
County Commission may not exercise any of the powers granted
in this amendment inside the corporate limits of any
municipality; within any other territory in which a
municipality or an instrumentality of a municipality is
authorized by an act of the Legislature to exercise the power;
or within any other county, except by contract with the
municipality, municipality instrumentality, or county
affected.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
Page 2

for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
HB525 INTRODUCED
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284, 284.01, and 285
of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
of this state. The appropriate election official shall assign
a ballot number for the proposed constitutional amendment on
the election ballot and shall set forth the following
description of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Relating to Covington County, proposing an amendment
to the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to grant the Covington
County Commission authority to adopt ordinances to protect
public health and welfare; regulate the environmental impact
of any industry, project, or activity; and establish and
provide for civil penalties.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved by
a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 3